Massachusetts, session 194th, S707.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby 
2 amended by inserting after Chapter 167J the following new chapter:-    
3  Chapter 167K Regulation of Virtual Currency Kiosks  
4  Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly 
5 requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
6  1. New customer. “New customer” means an individual who has never previously 
7 transacted with the virtual currency kiosk operator. The new customer shall remain defined as 
8 such during the thirty (30) day period after the first financial transaction with the virtual currency 
9 kiosk operator.  

2 of 13 10  2. Virtual currency address. "Virtual currency address" means an alphanumeric 
11 identifier associated with a virtual currency wallet identifying the location to which a virtual 
12 currency transaction can be sent.  
13  3. Transaction hash. "Transaction hash" means a unique identifier made up of a 
14 string of characters that act as a record of and provide proof that the transaction was verified and 
15 added to the blockchain.  
16  4. Virtual currency wallet. "Virtual currency wallet" means a software application or 
17 other mechanism providing a means to hold, store or transfer virtual currency. 
18  5. Virtual currency kiosk. "Virtual currency kiosk" means an electronic terminal 
19 acting as a mechanical agent of the virtual currency kiosk operator to enable the virtual currency 
20 kiosk operator to facilitate the exchange of virtual currency for money, bank credit, or other 
21 virtual currency, including but not limited to by (1) connecting directly to a separate “virtual 
22 currency exchange" that performs the actual virtual currency transmission, or (2) drawing upon 
23 the virtual currency in the possession of the electronic terminal's operator.  
24  6. Virtual currency kiosk operator. “Virtual-currency kiosk operator" means a 
25 person that engages in virtual-currency business activity via a money transmission kiosk located 
26 in this State or a person that owns, operates, or manages a money transmission kiosk located in 
27 this State through which virtual-currency business activity is offered. 
28  7. Virtual currency kiosk transaction. "Virtual currency kiosk transaction" means a 
29 transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means via a virtual 
30 currency kiosk. Virtual currency kiosk transaction also means a transaction made at a virtual 

3 of 13 31 currency kiosk to purchase virtual currency with fiat currency or to sell virtual currency for fiat 
32 currency. 
33  8. Blockchain. “Blockchain” means a mathematically secured, chronological and 
34 decentralized ledger or database. 
35  9. Blockchain analytics. “Blockchain analytics” means the analysis of data from 
36 blockchains or public distributed ledgers, including associated transaction information. 
37  10. Blockchain analytics software. “Blockchain analytics software” means a software 
38 service that uses blockchain analytics data to provide risk-specific information about virtual 
39 currency wallet addresses, among other things. 
40  11. Commissioner. “Commissioner” means the commissioner of banks. 
41  Section 2. A kiosk operator shall not engage in virtual-currency business activity or hold 
42 itself out as being able to engage in virtual-currency business activity with or on behalf of 
43 another person unless the kiosk operator is licensed in the state as a money transmitter.  
44  a. A virtual currency kiosk operator shall not locate, or allow a third party to locate, 
45 a virtual currency kiosk in this State unless the virtual currency kiosk operator registers the 
46 money transmission kiosk and obtains the prior approval of the commissioner for its activation.  
47  b. Each virtual currency kiosk operator shall submit a quarterly report of the location 
48 of each virtual currency kiosk located within the State within 45 days of the end of the calendar 
49 quarter. The location report shall include, at a minimum, the following regarding the location 
50 where a virtual currency kiosk is located: 
51  i. Company legal name; 

4 of 13 52  ii. Any fictitious or trade name;  
53  iii. Physical address;  
54  iv. Start date of operation of virtual currency kiosk at location; 
55  v. End date of operation of virtual currency kiosk at location, if applicable; and 
56  vi. Virtual currency address(es) associated with the virtual currency kiosk 
57  Section 3. A virtual currency kiosk operator must disclose in a clear, conspicuous, and 
58 easily readable manner in the chosen language of the customer, all relevant terms and conditions 
59 generally associated with the products, services, and activities of the virtual currency kiosk 
60 operator and virtual currency.  
61  a. Acknowledgment of disclosures. The virtual currency kiosk operator must receive 
62 acknowledgement of receipt of all disclosures required under this section via confirmation of 
63 consent.  
64  b. Relevant disclosures. The disclosures under this subdivision must address at least 
65 the following: 
66  i. A warning, written prominently and in bold type, and provided separately from 
67 the disclosures below, stating: "WARNING: LOSSES DUE TO FRAUDULENT OR 
68 ACCIDENTAL TRANSACTIONS ARE NOT RECOVERABLE AND TRANSACTIONS IN 
69 VIRTUAL CURRENCY ARE IRREVERSIBLE. VIRTUAL CURRENCY TRANSACTIONS 
70 MAY BE USED TO STEAL YOUR MONEY BY CRIMINALS IMPERSONATING THE 
71 GOVERNMENT, ORGANIZATIONS, OR YOUR LOVED ONES. THEY CAN THREATEN 
72 JAIL TIME, SAY YOUR IDENTITY HAS BEEN STOLEN, ALLEGE YOUR COMPUTER 

5 of 13 73 HAS BEEN HACKED, INSIST YOU WITHDRAW MONEY FROM YOUR BANK 
74 ACCOUNT TO PURCHASE VIRTUAL CURRENCY, OR A NUMBER OF OTHER SCAMS. 
75 IF YOU BELIEVE YOU ARE BEING SCAMMED, CALL YOUR LOCAL LAW 
76 ENFORCEMENT."  
77  ii. The material risks associated with virtual currency and virtual currency 
78 transactions, including: 
79  1. A warning that once completed, the transaction may not be reversed; 
80  2. The virtual currency kiosk operator’s liability for unauthorized virtual currency 
81 transactions; 
82  3. The virtual currency kiosk customer’s liability for unauthorized currency 
83 transactions; 
84  4. Virtual currency is not legal tender, backed or insured by the government, and 
85 accounts and value balances are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, National 
86 Credit Union Administration, or Securities Investor Protection Corporation protections; 
87  5. Some virtual currency transactions are deemed to be made when recorded on a 
88 public ledger which may not be the date or time when the person initiates the transaction; 
89  6. Virtual currency's value may be derived from market participants' continued 
90 willingness to exchange fiat currency for virtual currency, which may result in the permanent 
91 and total loss of a particular virtual currency's value if the market for virtual currency disappears; 
92  7. A person who accepts a virtual currency as payment today is not required to 
93 accept and might not accept virtual currency in the future 

6 of 13 94  8. The volatility and unpredictability of the price of virtual currency relative to fiat 
95 currency may result in a significant loss over a short period; 
96  9. The nature of virtual currency means that any technological difficulties 
97 experienced by virtual currency kiosk operators may prevent access to or use of a person's virtual 
98 currency; and, 
99  10. Any bond maintained by the virtual currency kiosk operator for the benefit of a 
100 person may not cover all losses a person incurs. 
101  iii. The amount of the transaction denominated in US Dollars as well as the 
102 applicable virtual currency; 
103  iv. Any fees or expenses charged by the virtual currency kiosk operator; 
104  v. Any applicable exchange rates; 
105  vi. A daily virtual currency transaction limit of no more than $1,000;  
106  vii. Notice of a change in the virtual currency kiosk operator's rules or policies; 
107  viii. The name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the kiosk and the days, 
108 time, and means by which a consumer can contact the owner for consumer assistance shall be 
109 displayed on or at the location of the virtual currency kiosk, or on the first screen of such kiosk. 
110  ix. Under what circumstances the virtual currency kiosk operator, without a court or 
111 government order, discloses a person's account information to third parties; 
112  x. Other disclosures that are customarily given in connection with a virtual currency 
113 transaction.  

7 of 13 114  c. Transaction receipt. Upon each transaction's completion, the virtual currency 
115 kiosk operator must provide a person with a physical receipt in the language chosen by the 
116 customer containing the following information:  
117  i. The virtual currency kiosk operator's name and contact information, including a 
118 telephone number to answer questions and register complaints; 
119  ii. The type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction, transaction hash, and 
120 each applicable virtual currency address; 
121  iii. The name and contact information of the sender; 
122  iv. The name and contact information of the designated recipient; 
123  v. All fees charged; 
124  vi. The exchange rate of the virtual currency to US Dollars; 
125  vii. A statement of the virtual currency kiosk operator's liability for non-delivery or 
126 delayed delivery; 
127  viii. A statement of the virtual currency kiosk operator's refund policy; and, 
128  ix. Any additional information the [relevant state authority] may require.  
129  Section 4. All virtual currency kiosk operators must use blockchain analytics software to 
130 assist in the prevention of sending purchased virtual currency from a virtual currency kiosk 
131 operator to a virtual currency wallet known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of 
132 a transaction. The commissioner may request evidence from any virtual currency kiosk operator 
133 of current use of blockchain analytics. 

8 of 13 134  a. Fraud policy. All virtual currency kiosk operators shall take reasonable steps to 
135 detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and maintaining a written anti-fraud policy.  The 
136 anti-fraud policy shall, at a minimum, include:  
137  i. the identification and assessment of fraud related risk areas;  
138  ii. procedures and controls to protect against identified risks;  
139  iii. allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks; and 
140  iv. procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of the anti-fraud procedures, 
141 controls, and monitoring mechanisms.  
142  b. Compliance officer. Each virtual currency kiosk operator must designate and 
143 employ a compliance officer with the following requirements: 
144  i. the individual must be qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this 
145 Act and all other applicable Federal and State laws, rules, and regulations; 
146  ii. the individual must be employed full-time by the virtual currency kiosk operator; 
147 and 
148  iii. the designated compliance officer cannot be any individual who owns more than 
149 20% of the virtual currency kiosk operator by whom the individual is employed.  
150  iv. Compliance responsibilities required under Federal and State laws, rules, and 
151 regulations shall be completed by full-time employees of the virtual currency kiosk operator. 
152  c. Refunds for new customers. A virtual currency kiosk operator must issue a refund 
153 to a new customer for the full amount of all transactions made within the thirty (30) day new 

9 of 13 154 customer time period upon the request of the customer. In order to receive a refund under this 
155 section, a new customer must have been fraudulently induced to engage in the virtual currency 
156 transactions and contacts the virtual currency kiosk operator and a government or law 
157 enforcement to inform them of the fraudulent nature of the transaction agency within ninety (90) 
158 days of the last transaction to occur during the thirty (30) day new customer time period. 
159  d. Refunds for existing customers. A virtual currency kiosk operator must issue a 
160 refund to an existing customer for the full amount of all transaction fees upon the request of an 
161 existing customer. In order to receive a refund under this section, a customer must have been 
162 fraudulently induced to engage in the virtual currency transactions and contacts the virtual 
163 currency kiosk operator and a government or law enforcement agency to inform them of the 
164 fraudulent nature of the transaction within ninety (90) days of the transaction. 
165  Section 5. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall not accept transactions of more than 
166 $1,000 US Dollars of cash or the equivalent in virtual currency in a day in connection with 
167 virtual currency kiosk transactions with a single customer in this State via one or more virtual 
168 currency kiosks. 
169  Section 6. The aggregate fees and charges, directly or indirectly, charged  to a customer 
170 related to a single transaction or series of related transactions  involving virtual currency effected 
171 through a money transmission kiosk in this State, including any difference between the price 
172 charged to a customer to buy, sell, exchange, swap, or convert virtual currency and the prevailing 
173 market value of such virtual currency at the time of such transaction, shall not exceed the greater 
174 of the following:  
175  a. $5.00; or  

10 of 13 176  b. three (3) percent of the U.S. dollar equivalent of virtual currency involved in the 
177 transaction or transactions.  
178  Section 7. All virtual currency kiosk operators performing business in the State must 
179 provide live customer service at a minimum on Monday through Friday between 8AM EST and 
180 10PM EST.  The customer service toll free number must be displayed on the virtual currency 
181 kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk screens. 
182  SECTION 2. Chapter 10, of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
183 is hereby amended by inserting after section 78 the following section:- 
184  Section 79. The office of the state treasurer shall develop and periodically review and 
185 update a digital module and resources on virtual currencies and digital assets to support 
186 Massachusetts residents with overseeing their finances, understanding money management 
187 strategies, and protecting their security; provided that, said module shall include curricula 
188 specifically tailored for older adults, including with respect to fraud prevention. 
189  SECTION 3. (1) There shall be a special commission established for the purposes of 
190 making an investigation relative to blockchain technology to develop a master plan of 
191 recommendations for fostering the appropriate expansion of blockchain technology in the 
192 Commonwealth. 
193  (2) The commission shall consist of 25 members: the speaker of the house of 
194 representatives or a designee who shall serve as co-chair; the minority leader of the house of 
195 representatives or a designee; the president of the senate or a designee who shall serve as co-
196 chair; the minority leader of the senate or a designee; four members of the house of 
197 representatives appointed by the speaker; four members of the senate appointed by the president; 

11 of 13 198 the attorney general or a designee; the chair of the cannabis control commission or a designee; 
199 the commissioner of the department of revenue or a designee; the secretary of the executive 
200 office of technology services and security or a designee; the secretary of public safety and 
201 security or a designee; three persons to be appointed by the state secretary, provided that one 
202 shall represent an organization focused on consumer protection; and five persons to be appointed 
203 by the governor including one appointee from a financial technology company, one appointee of 
204 a company with a business model that uses blockchain technology for purposes other than digital 
205 assets and two appointees representing institutions of higher education in the commonwealth. 
206  All appointments shall be made not later than 45 days after the effective date of this act. 
207 The chairpersons shall meet with the commission not later than 90 days after the effective date of 
208 this act. 
209  (3) The commission shall be charged with examining the following: 
210  (a) The feasibility, validity and admissibility as well as risks, including privacy risks, and 
211 benefits of using blockchain technology in state and local government and commonwealth-based 
212 businesses; provided that, for the purposes of government use, the commission’s examination 
213 shall include but not be limited to consideration of government records and delivery of services; 
214 court proceedings; statewide registries including for firearms, marijuana and opiates and election 
215 nomination papers, voter records and election results; and provided further that, for the purposes 
216 of business use, the commission’s examination shall include but not be limited to consideration 
217 of the advisability of allowing corporate records to be maintained using blockchain technology, 
218 including any security requirements necessary to ensure their accuracy; 

12 of 13 219  (b) The need for modifications to the definition of blockchain in this act and to general 
220 law to effect the appropriate deployment of blockchain technology; 
221  (c) The impact of the proliferation of the virtual currency industry on state revenues and 
222 the need to restructure the commonwealth’s tax framework, including the advisability of taxing 
223 virtual currency transactions as part of the sales tax; 
224  (d) The advisability of government agencies and relevant business enterprises, including 
225 but not limited to cannabis retail stores, accepting payment in virtual currency; 
226  (e) The feasibility of regulating the energy consumption associated with virtual currency; 
227  (f) The consumer protection activities necessary to provide safeguards and offer 
228 technological literacy to Massachusetts residents, including but not limited to the advisability of 
229 licensure requirements; 
230  (g) The best practices for enabling blockchain technology to benefit the commonwealth, 
231 Massachusetts-based businesses, and Massachusetts residents, including an examination of 
232 historical barriers to entry and participation in emerging technologies and markets for individuals 
233 underrepresented in these industries and markets; 
234  (h) The state agencies best equipped to provide oversight of blockchain technology and 
235 the virtual currency industry, including with respect to consumer protection; and 
236  (i) Any other related topic which the commission may choose to examine in relation to 
237 blockchain technology. 

13 of 13 238  The commission shall take input from a broad range of stakeholders with a diverse range 
239 of interests affected by state policies governing emerging technologies, privacy, business, 
240 finance, the courts, the legal community, and state and local government. 
241  (4) Not later than one year after all appointments to the commission have been made 
242 pursuant to section 3 of this act, the commission shall report to the general court the result of its 
243 investigation and its master plan of recommendations to foster a positive blockchain technology 
244 environment, together with drafts of legislation necessary to effect its recommendations, by 
245 filing the same with the clerk of the house of representatives and the clerk of the senate. 
246  SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.